Utah statutes.
58-55-302.5.   Continuing education requirements of contractor licensees -- Continuing education courses.

(1)  Each contractor licensee under a license issued under this chapter shall complete six hours of approved continuing education during each two-year renewal cycle established by rule under Subsection 58-55-303(1).

(2) (a)  The commission shall, with the concurrence of the division, establish by rule a program of approved continuing education for contractor licensees.

(b)  Before a new course or a course being considered for reapproval may be included in the program of approved continuing education for contractor licensees, the commission and the division shall invite and consider written input, received within 30 days of the invitation, regarding the course from:

(i)  the Associated General Contractors of Utah;

(ii)  the Home Builders Association of Utah;

(iii)  the Utah Subcontractors Council;

(iv)  the Utah Plumbing & Heating Contractors Association;

(v)  the Independent Electrical Contractors of Utah; and

(vi)  the Rocky Mountain Gas Association.

(3)  The division may contract with a person to establish and maintain a continuing education registry to include:

(a)  an online application for a continuing education course provider to apply to the division for approval of the course for inclusion in the program of approved continuing education;

(b)  a list of courses that the division has approved for inclusion in the program of approved continuing education; and

(c)  a list of courses that:

(i)  a contractor licensee has completed under the program of approved continuing education; and

(ii)  the licensee may access to monitor the licensee's compliance with the continuing education requirement established under Subsection (1).

(4)  The division may charge a fee, as established by the division under Section 63J-1-504, to administer the requirements of this section.



Amended by Chapter 430, 2013 General Session

